Louisiana, session 2026, HB1030.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1257.1(5) through (7) and 1257.6 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1257.1. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the meaning ascribed in this
Section:
* * *
(5) "Institution for mental diseases" means an institution for mental diseases
as defined in 42 CFR 435.1010 and 42 CFR 441.13 as those regulations may be
amended.
(6) "Institution for mental diseases psychiatric service" means an inpatient
or outpatient psychiatric or behavioral health service furnished to a Medicaid
beneficiary within the scope of and covered under the state medical assistance
program and is related to the beneficiary's psychiatric treatment plan including
admission to or discharge from an institution for mental diseases.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1597 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1030
(7) "Institution for mental diseases transportation service" means
nonemergency medical transportation furnished by or through an institution for
mental diseases to a Medicaid beneficiary who is a patient or resident of such
institution for the purpose of transporting the beneficiary to or from an institution for
mental diseases psychiatric service. This includes transportation to the institution
upon admission and from the institution upon discharge and includes transportation
between the institution and the beneficiary's residence, an originating facility, or any
other location associated with the beneficiary's psychiatric admission, discharge, or
treatment.
* * *
§1257.6. Institution for mental diseases; transportation for psychiatric services;
reimbursement
A.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an institution for
mental diseases may furnish institution for mental diseases transportation services,
using vehicles owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the institution or through
an arrangement with a transportation provider under contract with the institution for
the limited purpose of furnishing transportation services for its own Medicaid
beneficiaries who are patients or residents of the institution.
(2) Institution for mental diseases transportation services may be for
admitting to an inpatient level of care or for the patient to receive outpatient medical
services from the institution for mental diseases provider.
B.(1) Institution for mental diseases transportation services furnished
pursuant to this Section shall be reimbursed at the same base and mileage rates and
in the same manner as otherwise applicable to nonemergency medical transportation
services under the Medicaid fee schedule in effect on the date of service.
(2) The department shall ensure that institution for mental diseases
transportation services are payable under fee-for-service Medicaid when the
beneficiary is eligible for such payment.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1597 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1030
(3) For Medicaid beneficiaries enrolled in a managed care organization or
other capitated entity under contract with the department, each managed care
organization shall reimburse the institution for institution for mental diseases
transportation services at a rate not less than the Medicaid fee schedule rate
described in this Subsection and such reimbursement shall be made directly to the
institution or its designee.
C. Institution for mental diseases transportation services furnished pursuant
to this Section shall not be required to be arranged, authorized, scheduled,
dispatched, or paid through the department's nonemergency medical transportation
brokerage program, a Medicaid transportation broker, third-party administrator, or
any successor entity administering nonemergency medical transportation brokerage
services for the department or a managed care organization.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to exempt an institution for
mental diseases, its agents, or any vehicle or driver used to furnish institution for
mental diseases transportation services from compliance with applicable state and
federal requirements.
E. The department may by rule establish minimum standards necessary to
ensure patient safety. This includes requirements related to vehicle safety, driver
qualifications, insurance, record keeping, and audit access considering the existing
standards and requirements in place for institution for mental diseases licensure.
F.(1) Institution for mental diseases transportation services authorized by this
Section are limited to transportation to or from institution for mental diseases
psychiatric services.
(2) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize reimbursement for
transportation to or from non-psychiatric medical, dental, pharmacy, laboratory,
imaging, or other Medicaid-covered services not included within the definition of
institution for mental diseases psychiatric service.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1597 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1030
(3) Institution for mental diseases transportation services shall not occur if
the patient is not intended to receive inpatient or outpatient services from the
institution for mental diseases providing the transportation.
G. The provisions of this Section shall not be implemented unless approved
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027. The
Louisiana Department of Health shall submit the necessary implementation plan to
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services by August 1, 2026.